California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(b) The relinquished former portion of Route 146 within the City of Soledad is not a state highway and is not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portion of Route 146, the City of Soledad shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 146 until the entire route has been relinquished and shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portion of Route 146, including
 any traffic signal progression.

(1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commission may relinquish to the County of Monterey the portion of Route 146 within the limits of that county, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commission may relinquish to the County of San Benito the portion of Route 146 within the limits of that county, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state.

(3) A relinquishment under this subdivision shall become effective immediately after the county recorder records the relinquishment resolution that contains the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(4) On and
 after the effective date of the relinquishment, that portion of Route 146 relinquished shall cease to be a state highway and may not be considered for future adoption under Section 81.

(5) For portions of Route 146 relinquished under this subdivision, the Counties of Monterey and San Benito shall maintain within their jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 146 until the entire route has been relinquished.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 769, Sec. 27.   (AB 2679)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

447.

Route 147 is from Route 89 near Canyon Dam to Route 36 near Westwood.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

448.

Route 148 is from:

(a) Route 5 near Sacramento to Route 143 south of Route 16.

(b) Route 143 south of Route 16 to Route 65.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1187, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

449.

Route 149 is from Route 70 near Wicks Corner to Route 99 south of Chico.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

450.

Route 150 is from Route 101 near the Ventura-Santa Barbara county line to Route 126 near Santa Paula.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

451.

Route 151 is from Shasta Dam to Route 5 near the City of Shasta Lake.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 491, Sec. 27.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

452.

Route 152 is from:

(a) Route 1 near Watsonville via Hecker Pass to Route 101 in Gilroy.

(b) Route 101 near Gilroy to Route 65 near Sharon via Pacheco Pass.

(c) The commission may relinquish to the City of Watsonville the portion of Route 152, beginning at Route 1 and ending at Beverly Drive or some segment thereof, within the city limits of the City of Watsonville, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state.

(d) A relinquishment under this section shall become effective
 immediately following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(e) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, both of the following shall occur:

(1) The portion of Route 152 relinquished under this section shall cease to be a state highway.

(2) The portion of Route 152 relinquished under this section shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(f) The City of Watsonville shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portions of Route 152, including, but not limited to, any traffic signal progression.

(g) For those portions of Route
 152 that are relinquished, the City of Watsonville shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 152.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 769, Sec. 28.   (AB 2679)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

453.

Route 153 is from Route 49 near Coloma to Marshall’s Monument.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

454.

Route 154 is from Route 101 near Zaca to Route 101 near Santa Barbara via San Marcos Pass.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

455.

Route 155 is from Route 99 near Delano to Route 178 near Isabella via Glennville.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1372.)
-------------------------------------------

456.

Route 156 is from:

(a) Route 1 near Castroville to Route 101 near Prunedale.

(b) Route 101 to Route 152 passing near San Juan Bautista and Hollister.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

458.

Route 158 is from Route 395 near June Lake to Route 395 near Rush Creek, via the vicinity of June Lake, Silver Lake and Grant Lake.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1371.)
-------------------------------------------

460.

(a) Route 160 is from:

(1) Route 4 near Antioch to the southern city limits of Sacramento.

(2) The American River in the City of Sacramento to Route 51.

(b) The relinquished former portion of Route 160 within the City of Sacramento is not a state highway and is not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portion of Route 160, the City of Sacramento shall maintain signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 160.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 491, Sec. 28.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

461.

Route 161 is from Route 97 near Dorris to Route 139 near Hatfield.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

462.

Route 162 is from:

(a) Route 101 near Longvale to Route 5 near Willows via the vicinity of Covelo and Mendocino Pass.

(b) Route 5 near Willows to Route 45.

(c) Route 45 to Route 99 near Biggs.

(d) Route 99 near Richvale to Route 70 near Oroville.

(e) Route 70 near Oroville to Foreman Creek Road via the Bidwell Bar Bridge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

463.

Route 163 is from Route 5 near Balboa Park in San Diego to Route 15 near Miramar Naval Air Station.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

464.

(a) Route 164 is Rosemead Boulevard from:

(1) Gallatin Road near Pico Rivera to the southern city limit of South El Monte in the vicinity of Rush Street.

(2) The southern city limit of South El Monte in the vicinity of Rush Street to the southern city limit of El Monte in the vicinity of
 the Rio Hondo River.

(3) The southern city limit of El Monte in the vicinity of
 the Rio Hondo River to the southern city limit of Temple City in the vicinity of Grand Avenue.

(4) Route 210 to Foothill Boulevard in the City of Pasadena.

(b) The relinquished former portions of Route 164 within the County of Los Angeles and the City of Temple City are not state highways and are not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portions of Route 164, the County of Los Angeles and the City of Temple City shall maintain within their respective jurisdictions signs directing motorists to
 the continuation of Route 164.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commission may relinquish to the County of Los Angeles that portion of Route 164 described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), pursuant to the terms of a cooperative agreement between the county and the department, upon a determination by the commission that the relinquishment is in the best interests of the state.

(2) A relinquishment under this subdivision shall become effective immediately following the recordation by the county recorder of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(3) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, both of the following shall apply:

(A) The portion of Route 164 relinquished under this subdivision shall cease to be a state highway.

(B) The portion of Route 164 relinquished under this subdivision may not be considered for future adoption under Section 81.

(4) For the portion of Route 164 that is relinquished under this subdivision, the County of Los Angeles shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 164.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commission may relinquish to the City of South El Monte
 that portion of Route 164 described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), pursuant to the terms of a cooperative agreement between the city and the department, upon a determination by the commission that the relinquishment is in the best interests of the state.

(2) A relinquishment under this subdivision shall become effective immediately following the recordation by the county recorder of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(3) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, both of the following shall apply:

(A) The portion of Route 164 relinquished under this subdivision shall cease to be a state highway.

(B) The portion of Route 164 relinquished under this subdivision may not be considered for future adoption under Section 81.

(4) For the portion of Route 164 that is
 relinquished under this subdivision, the City of South El Monte shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 164.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 575, Sec. 1.   (SB 461)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

465.

Route 165 is from Route 5 south of Los Banos to Route 99 near Turlock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1473.)
-------------------------------------------

466.

Route 166 is from:

(a) Route 1 near Guadalupe to Route 101 in Santa Maria.

(b) Route 101 near Santa Maria to Route 33 in Cuyama Valley.

(c) Route 33 near Maricopa easterly to Route 99.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

467.

Route 167 is from Route 395 north of Mono Lake to the Nevada state line in the vicinity of the Pole Line Road.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

468.

Route 168 is from:

(a) Fresno to Huntington Lake.

(b) Camp Sabrina to Route 395.

(c) Route 395 at Big Pine to Route 266 at Oasis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 928, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

469.

Route 169 is from Route 101 near Klamath to Route 96 near Weitchpec. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 81 of this code, the department may maintain a traversable highway located in portions of the area between the termini of and approximately on this route even though the highway is not continuous.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

470.

(a) Route 170 is from Route 101 near Riverside Drive to Route 5 near Tujunga Wash.

(b) The relinquished former portion of Route 170 within the City of Los Angeles between Route 2 and Route 101 is not a state highway and is not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For that relinquished former portion of Route 170, the City of Los Angeles shall maintain signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 14.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

472.

Route 172 is from Route 36 at Mineral to Route 36 near Morgan Summit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

473.

Route 173 is from Route 138 to Route 18 via Lake Arrowhead.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

474.

(a) Route 174 is from Route 80 near the City of Colfax to Route 20 near the City of Grass Valley.

(b) (1) Upon the commission determining that it is in the best interests of the state to do so, the
 commission may, upon terms and conditions it approves, relinquish to the City of Grass Valley the portion of Route 174 within the city limits of the City of Grass Valley if the department and the City of Grass Valley enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(2) A relinquishment under this section shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(c) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, all of the following shall occur:

(1) The relinquished portion of Route 174 shall cease to be a state highway.

(2) The relinquished portion of Route 174 shall be ineligible for future
 adoption under Section 81.

(3) The City of Grass Valley shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portion of Route 174, including, but not limited to, any traffic signal progression.

(4) For the relinquished portion of Route 174, the City of Grass Valley shall maintain signs within its jurisdiction directing motorists to the continuation of Route 174.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 82, Sec. 1.   (SB 921)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

475.

Route 175 is from:

(a) Route 101 at Hopland to Route 29 near Lakeport.

(b) Route 29 near Kelseyville to Route 29 at Middletown.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1220, Sec. 43.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

477.

Route 177 is from Route 10 near Desert Center to Route 62 near Granite Pass.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

478.

(a) Route 178 is from:

(1) Bakersfield to Route 14 near Freeman via Walker Pass.

(2) Route 14 near Freeman to Route 127.

(3) Route 127 to the Nevada state line in Pahrump Valley.

(b) The relinquished former portion of Route 178 within the City of Bakersfield is not a state highway and is not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portion of Route 178, the City of Bakersfield shall install and maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the
 continuation of Route 178 and shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portion of Route 178, including any traffic signal progression.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 769, Sec. 29.   (AB 2679)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

479.

Route 179 is from Route 80 near Vacaville to Route 128 near Berryessa Reservoir.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

480.

Route 180 is from:

(a) Route 25 near Paicines to Route 5.

(b) Route 5 to Route 99 passing near Mendota.

(c) Route 99 near Fresno to the General Grant Grove section of Kings Canyon National Park.

(d) The General Grant Grove section of Kings Canyon National Park to Kings Canyon National Park boundary near Cedar Grove.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 53.)
-------------------------------------------

481.

Route 181 is from Route 116 near Forestville to Route 101.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

482.

Route 182 is from Route 395 near Bridgeport to the Nevada state line via Walker River.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

483.

(a) Route 183 is from Route 101 in the City of Salinas to Route 1 near Castroville.

(b) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best interests of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish to the City of Salinas the portion of Route 183 within its jurisdiction, if the department and the city enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(c) The following conditions apply upon relinquishment:

(1) The relinquishment shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(2) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, the relinquished portion of Route 183 shall cease to be a state highway.

(3) The entirety of Route 183 relinquished under this section shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 83, Sec. 1.   (SB 1459)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

484.

(a) Route 184 is from Route 223 near Weedpatch to Route 178.

(b) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best interests of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish to the County of Kern and the City of Bakersfield the portion of Route 184 that is located within the
 unincorporated area of the county and within the city limits between Route 58 and Route 178, if the department and the county and city enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(c) The following conditions apply upon relinquishment:

(1) The relinquishment shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(2) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, the relinquished portion of Route 184 shall cease to be a state highway.

(3) The portion of Route 184 relinquished under subdivision (b) and this subdivision shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 69, Sec. 1.   (AB 2006)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

484.1.

The portion of State Highway Route 184 at the intersection of Sunset Boulevard and adjacent to the Sunset Middle School in the County of Kern is hereby designated as a school zone. The school zone shall be identified with standard “SCHOOL” warning signs consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 22352 of the Vehicle Code, and the prima facie speed limits within the school zone shall be as provided in that subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 221, Sec. 1.   (AB 1115)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

485.

(a) Route 185 is from Route 92 in Hayward to Route 77 in Oakland.

(b) The relinquished former portions of Route 185 within the City of Hayward and within the unincorporated area of the County of Alameda are not a state highway and are not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portions of Route 185, the City of Hayward and the County of Alameda shall maintain within their respective jurisdictions signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 185 or to the state highway system, as applicable.

(c) (1) The commission may relinquish to the City of
 Hayward, to the City of San Leandro,
 or to the County of Alameda all or any portion of Route 185 located within the city limits of those cities or within the unincorporated area of the County of Alameda, as applicable, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state, if the department and either of those cities or
 the County of Alameda enters into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(2) A relinquishment under this subdivision shall become effective immediately after the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(3) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, both of the following shall occur:

(A) The portion of Route 185 relinquished shall cease to be a state highway.

(B) The portion of Route 185 relinquished shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(4) For relinquished portions of Route 185, the City of
 Hayward, the City of San Leandro, or the County of Alameda shall maintain signs within their respective jurisdictions directing motorists to the continuation of Route 185 or to the state highway system, as applicable.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) The jurisdiction of the City of Hayward shall refer to all relinquished portions of Route 185 within the City of Hayward.

(2) The jurisdiction of the City of San Leandro shall refer to all relinquished portions of Route 185 within the City of San Leandro.

(3) The jurisdiction of the County of Alameda shall refer to all relinquished portions of Route 185 in the unincorporated area of the County of Alameda.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 321, Sec. 1.   (AB 2473)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

486.

Route 186 is from the international boundary near Algodones to Route 8.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

487.

(a) Route 187 is from Lincoln Boulevard to Route 10 via Venice Boulevard.

(b) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the
 best interest of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish to the City of Los Angeles Route 187 within the city between the route’s western terminus at Lincoln Boulevard (approximately postmile 3.5) and its eastern terminus at Cadillac Avenue near Route 10 (approximately postmile 8.9), if the department and the city enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment. The following conditions shall apply upon relinquishment:

(1) The relinquishment shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(2) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, Route 187
 shall cease to be a state highway.

(3) Route 187, as relinquished under this subdivision, shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 561, Sec. 2.   (AB 810)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

487.1.

The title to that portion of the right-of-way acquired by the City of Los Angeles, and furnished to the State of California, for Route 187, but not needed for that route upon its construction, is hereby relinquished to the city. However, before any relinquishment occurs, the department shall concur that such portion is not needed for state highway purposes, and the portion being relinquished shall be precisely described and recorded with the County Recorder of Los Angeles County.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 824.)
-------------------------------------------

488.

Route 188 is from the international boundary near Tecate to Route 94.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

489.

Route 189 is from Route 18 near Strawberry Peak to Route 173 near Lake Arrowhead via Strawberry Flat.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

490.

Route 190 is from Route 99 near Tipton to Route 127 near Death Valley Junction via the vicinity of Porterville, Camp Nelson, Olancha, and Death Valley.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

491.

Route 191 is from Route 70 near Wicks Corner to Paradise.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

492.

Route 192 is from Route 154 near Santa Barbara to Route 150 near the Ventura-Santa Barbara county line via Foothill Boulevard.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

493.

(a) Route 193 is from:

(1) The City of Lincoln to Route 80 near the City of Newcastle.

(2) Route 49 near the community of Cool to Route 49 near the City of Placerville
 through the Town of Georgetown.

(b) The relinquished former portion of Route 193 within the City of Lincoln is not a state highway and is not eligible for adoption under Section 81.

(c) (1) The commission may relinquish to the City of Lincoln the portion of Route 193 that is located within the city limits of the City of Lincoln, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state, if the department and the city enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment.

(2) A relinquishment under this subdivision shall become effective immediately following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the
 terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(3) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, the relinquished portion of Route 193 shall cease to be a state highway.

(4) The portion of Route 193 relinquished under this subdivision shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 629, Sec. 1.   (AB 1456)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

495.

Route 195 is from Route 86 near Oasis to Route 111 near Mecca via Pierce Street and Avenue 66.

This route shall cease to be a state highway when Route 86 Expressway is constructed from near Oasis to Route 10.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 292, Sec. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

497.

Route 197 is from Route 199 to Route 101 staying north of the Smith River.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

498.

Route 198 is from:

(a) Route 101 near San Lucas to Route 33 at Coalinga.

(b) Route 33 near Oilfields to Route 99 via Hanford.

(c) Route 99 to the Sequoia National Park line via Visalia.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

499.

Route 199 is from Route 101 near Crescent City to the Oregon state line via the Smith River.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

500.

Route 200 is from Route 101 to Route 299 staying north of the Mad River.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

501.

(a) Route 201 is from:

(1) Route 99 near Kingsburg easterly to Route 63.

(2) Route 63 easterly to Route 245.

(b) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best interests of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish to the City of Kingsburg the portion of Route 201 that is located within the city limits of that city if the city agrees to accept it. The following conditions shall apply upon relinquishment:

(1) The relinquishment shall become effective on the date following
 the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(2) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, the relinquished portion of Route 201 shall cease to be a state highway.

(3) The portion of Route 201 relinquished under this subdivision shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(4) For the portion of Route 201 that is relinquished under this subdivision, the City of Kingsburg shall install and maintain within the jurisdiction of the city signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 201.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 189, Sec. 5.   (SB 532)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

502.

Route 202 is from California Correctional Institution at Tehachapi to Route 58 near Tehachapi.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

503.

(a) Route 203 is from the Mono county line near Minaret Summit to Route 395.

(b) (1) The commission may relinquish to the Town of Mammoth Lakes all or a portion of Route 203 within its jurisdiction, upon terms and conditions the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state, if the department and the Town of Mammoth Lakes enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment and the relinquishment complies with all applicable requirements of the Federal Highway
 Administration and the United States Forest Service.

(2) The relinquishment shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(3) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, all the following shall occur:

(A) The portion of Route 203 relinquished under this subdivision shall cease to be a state highway.

(B) The portion of Route 203 relinquished under this subdivision shall not be considered for future adoption under Section 81.

(C) The
 Town of Mammoth Lakes shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portion of Route 203, including, but not limited to, any traffic signal progression.

(D) For the relinquished portion of Route 203, the Town of Mammoth Lakes shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 203.

(E) The Town of Mammoth Lakes shall maintain the California legal truck route designation for the relinquished portion of Route 203 that previously held that designation.

(F) The Town of Mammoth Lakes shall coordinate the maintenance and operation of the relinquished portion of Route 203 with the Federal Highway Administration and the United States Forest
 Service, to the extent required by those federal agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 619, Sec. 1.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

504.

(a) Route 204 is from Route 58 to Route 99 near Bakersfield via Union Avenue and Golden State Avenue.

(b) Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best interests of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish to the City of Bakersfield the portion of Route 204 that is located within the city limits of that city if the city agrees to accept it. The following conditions shall apply upon relinquishment:

(1) The relinquishment shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(2) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, the relinquished portion of Route 204 shall cease to be a state highway.

(3) The portion of Route 204 relinquished under this subdivision shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 315, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

505.

Route 205 is from Route 580 west of Tracy to Route 5 east of Tracy.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

507.

Route 207 is from Route 4 near Lake Alpine to the Mt. Reba Ski Area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

510.

(a) Route 210 is from:

(1) Route 5 near Tunnel Station to Route 57 near the City of San Dimas via the vicinity of the City of San Fernando.

(2) Route 57 near the City of San Dimas to Route 10 in the City of Redlands via the vicinity of the City of Highland.

(b) Route 210 may be known and designated as the Southern California Native American Freeway or by the name described in subdivision (a) of Section 101.19.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 543, Sec. 3.   (AB 776)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

511.

Route 211 is from Route 1 near Rockport to Route 101 near Fernbridge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 58.)
-------------------------------------------

513.

Route 213 is from 25th Street in San Pedro to Route 405 via Western Avenue.

The commission may allocate from the State Highway Fund the necessary funds for the construction of all or any portion of said route when the County of Los Angeles and the Cities of Los Angeles and Torrance have entered into a co-operative agreement with the department wherein said cities and county shall furnish to the State of California without charge all right-of-way necessary and agree to pay one-half the cost of plans and construction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1729.)
-------------------------------------------

515.

Route 215 is from Route 15 near Temecula to Route 15 near Devore via Riverside and San Bernardino.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1220, Sec. 45.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

516.

Route 216 is from Visalia to Route 198 near Lemon Cove via Woodlake.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

517.

Route 217 is from:

(a) Route 101 near Ellwood to the campus of the University of California at Santa Barbara.

(b) The campus of the University of California at Santa Barbara to Route 101 northwest of the City of Santa Barbara.

Section (b) of this route shall be a memorial to the late Senator Clarence C. Ward of Santa Barbara County and shall hereafter be known as Clarence Ward Memorial Boulevard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

517.1.

Upon a determination by the commission that it is in the best interests of the state to do so, the commission may, upon terms and conditions approved by it, relinquish a portion of Route 217 from the westerly end of both the East Goleta overhead and the Route 101-217 separation structures to the University of California, Santa Barbara property line to Santa Barbara County, in which that portion of the highway is located, if the county has agreed to accept it. The relinquishment shall be effective on the day immediately following the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1007, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

518.

Route 218 is from Route 1 to Route 68 via Canyon del Rey.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

519.

Route 219 is from Route 99 at Salida easterly to Route 108.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

520.

Route 220 is from Route 84 on Ryer Island to Route 160.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

521.

Route 221 is from Route 29 near Soscol Road to Route 121 at Imola Avenue in Napa.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1187, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

522.

Route 222 is from Route 101 near Ukiah easterly to East Side Road in Talmage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1187, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

523.

Route 223 is from:

(a) Route 5 to Route 99 south of Greenfield.

(b) Route 99 south of Greenfield to Route 58.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

525.

(a) Route 225 is from Route 101 near Santa Barbara to Route 101 near the Santa Barbara Central Business District.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commission may relinquish to the City of Santa Barbara the entire Route 225 within the jurisdiction of the city, between the Route 101/225 separation at Las Positas Road and the Castillo Street interchange with Route 101, on terms and conditions that the commission finds to be in the best interests of the state, if the department and the city enter into an agreement providing for that relinquishment. The following conditions shall apply upon relinquishment:

(1) The
 relinquishment shall become effective on the date following the county recorder’s recordation of the relinquishment resolution containing the commission’s approval of the terms and conditions of the relinquishment.

(2) On and after the effective date of the relinquishment, Route 225 shall cease to be a state highway and shall be ineligible for future adoption under Section 81.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 536, Sec. 13.   (AB 957)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

527.

(a) Route 227 is from Route 1 south of Oceano to Route 101 in San Luis Obispo.

(b) The relinquished former portions of Route 227 within the Cities of Arroyo Grande and San Luis Obispo are not state highways and are not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For the relinquished former portion of Route 227, the Cities of San Luis Obispo and Arroyo Grande shall maintain within their respective jurisdictions signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 227 and shall ensure the continuity of traffic flow on the relinquished portion of Route 227, including any traffic signal progression.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 769, Sec. 32.   (AB 2679)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

529.

Route 229 is from Route 58 near Santa Margarita to Route 41 near Creston.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

530.

Route 230 is from Route 101 near the south city limits of San Francisco to Route 280 in San Francisco.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 89 of Chapter 1062 of the Statutes of 1959, construction of all or any portion of Route 230 may be commenced at any time, if the City and County of San Francisco has conveyed or does convey to the State of California, without charge, all real property presently acquired by it for the construction of such route or portion thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1473.)
-------------------------------------------

532.

(a) Route 232 is from Route 101 near El Rio to Route 118 near Saticoy.

(b) The relinquished former portions of Route 232 within the City of Oxnard are not state highways and are not eligible for adoption under Section 81. For those relinquished former portions of Route 232, the City of Oxnard shall maintain within its jurisdiction signs directing motorists to the continuation of Route 232.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 345, Sec. 9.   (AB 2752)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

533.

Route 233 is from Route 152 to Route 99 at Chowchilla via Robertson Boulevard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

534.

Route 234 is from Route 5 near French Camp to Route 99.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

535.

Route 235 is from Route 5 to Route 99 north of the Calaveras River in Stockton.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1187, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

536.

Route 236 is from Route 9 in Boulder Creek to Route 9 near Waterman Gap via Governor’s Camp in Big Basin Redwoods State Park.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1187, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

537.

Route 237 is from Route 82 in Mountain View to Route 680 in Milpitas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 106, Sec. 29.   Effective May 13, 1988.   Operative January 1, 1989, by Sec. 31 of Ch. 106.)